Kentucky statutes. TITLE XXIII Private Corporations and Associations
Subtitle 5. Office and Agent

271B.5-010.
Registered office and registered agent — Requirement for agent’s written acceptance of appointment.

Each corporation shall continuously maintain in this Commonwealth a registered office and a registered agent that comply with KRS

14A.4-010

.

History.

Enact. Acts 1988, ch. 23, § 29, effective January 1, 1989; 1998, ch. 341, § 6, effective July 15, 1998; 2011, ch. 29, § 8, effective June 8, 2011.

271B.5-020.
Change of registered office or registered agent. [Repealed.]

271B.5-025.
Statement of change of principal office.

A corporation that changes the mailing address of its principal office shall comply with KRS

14A.5-010

.

History.

Enact. Acts 2007, ch. 137, §
1, effective June 26, 2007; repealed and reenact., Acts 2010, ch. 51, §
1, effective July 15, 2010; repealed and reenact., ch. 151, §
54, effective January 1, 2011.

Legislative Research Commission Note.

(1/1/2011). This section was repealed and reenacted without change to the existing language by 2010 Ky. Acts ch. 51, effective 7/15/10, and repealed and reenacted with the new language by 2010 Ky. Acts ch. 151, effective 1/1/2011. Pursuant to Section 184 of Acts ch. 51, it was the intent of the General Assembly that the repeal and reenactment by ch. 51 not serve to void amendments made by other bills, and these Acts do not appear to be in conflict, therefore, they have been codified together.

Research References and Practice Aids

Kentucky Bench & Bar.

Rutledge, Recent Amendments to Kentucky Business Entity Laws, Vol. 71, No. 5, Sept. 2007, Ky. Bench & Bar 25.

Kentucky Law Journal.

Rutledge, The 2007 Amendments to the Kentucky Business Entity Statutes,
97 Ky. L.J. 229 (2008).

271B.5-030.
Resignation of registered agent. [Repealed.]

271B.5-040.
Service on corporation. [Repealed.]